Idaho, session 2025, H0369.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 8, Title 63, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 63-802B, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
63-802B. TAXING DISTRICT PROPOSAL TO INCREASE PROPERTY TAX REVENUES
-- REQUIREMENTS. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 63-802,
Idaho Code, a taxing district may certify a budget request for an amount of
property tax revenues to finance an annual budget that exceeds the taxing
district's prior year's certified budget for property tax revenues only
if the taxing district complies with the notice and hearing provisions set
forth in this section, except that:
(a) Taxing districts that propose a budget of less than one million
dollars ($1,000,000) shall be exempt from the requirements of this sec-
tion; and
(b) Any portion of proposed property tax revenue added as a result of
new construction, annexation, or the termination, deannexation, or
plan modification of a revenue allocation area of an urban renewal dis-
trict pursuant to section 63-301A(3)(f), (i), or (j), Idaho Code, shall
not be considered in calculating the amount of increase in property tax
revenues from a prior year under the provisions of this section.
(2) A taxing district that proposes to increase the dollar amount of
property tax revenues for its annual budget over the previous year shall pub-
lish a notice in a newspaper qualified to print legal notices pursuant to the
provisions of section 60-106, Idaho Code, and mail a copy of the same to each
owner of taxable property within the taxing district no earlier than four
(4) weeks before and no later than two (2) weeks before the taxing district's
budget hearing pursuant to section 63-802A, Idaho Code. The form and content
of the notice shall be substantially as follows:
NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE
[NAME OF TAXING DISTRICT]
The [name of the taxing district] is proposing to increase its prop-
erty tax revenue.
The [name of the taxing district] tax per one hundred thousand dol-
lars ($100,000) of taxable value of property, above any exemptions,


of residential property would increase from $______ to $________,
which is $_______ per year.
The [name of the taxing district] tax per one hundred thousand dol-
lars ($100,000) of taxable value of property, above any exemptions,
of commercial property would increase from $______ to $________,
which is $_______ per year.
The [name of the taxing district] tax per one hundred thousand dol-
lars ($100,000) of taxable value of property, above any exemptions,
of industrial property would increase from $______ to $________,
which is $_______ per year.
The [name of the taxing district] tax per one hundred thousand dol-
lars ($100,000) of taxable value of property, above any exemptions,
of land actively devoted to agriculture would increase from $______
to $________, which is $_______ per year.
The [name of the taxing district] tax per one hundred thousand dol-
lars ($100,000) of taxable value of property, above any exemptions,
of operating property would increase from $______ to $________,
which is $_______ per year.
If the proposed budget is approved, [name of the taxing district]
would receive an additional $______ in property tax revenue per
year as a result of the tax increase.
If the proposed budget is approved, [name of the taxing district]
would increase its property tax budgeted revenue by ___% above last
year's property tax budgeted revenue excluding new revenue added as
a result of new construction, annexation, and certain other exempt
revenue.
The [name of the taxing district] invites all concerned citizens to
a public hearing for the purpose of hearing comments regarding the
proposed tax increase and to explain the reasons for the proposed
tax increase.
PUBLIC HEARING
Date/Time: [date] [time]
Location: [name of hearing place and address of hearing place]
To obtain more information regarding the tax increase, citizens may
contact the [name of the taxing district] at [phone number of taxing
district] or visit [internet address for the taxing district's web-
site].
(3) The hearing notice shall:
(a) Be no less than one-quarter (1/4) page in size, use type no smaller
than 18-point font, and be surrounded by a one-quarter (1/4) inch bor-
der;
(b) Not be placed in that portion of the newspaper where legal notices
and classified advertisements appear;
(c) Be published in a newspaper of general interest and readership in
the taxing district that is published at least one (1) day per week,
whenever possible;


(d) Be run once each week for at least two (2) weeks, starting no ear-
lier than four (4) weeks before the taxing district's budget hearing and
no later than two (2) weeks before the taxing district conducts its bud-
get hearing. If a taxing district's public hearing information is pub-
lished by the county auditor in accordance with section 63-802A, Idaho
Code, the taxing district need only publish the notice once during the
week before the taxing district conducts a public hearing at which the
taxing district's annual budget is discussed;
(e) State that the taxing district will meet on a certain day, time, and
place fixed in the notice for the purpose of hearing comments regarding
the proposed increase and to explain the reasons for the proposed in-
crease; and
(f) State the internet address for the taxing district's public web-
site.
(4) A public hearing on the proposed tax increase shall be held pursuant
to the provisions of chapter 2, title 74, Idaho Code. It shall be open to
the public and held at a hearing of the taxing district with no items on the
agenda other than discussion and action on the taxing district's proposed
budget and property tax revenue increase request.
(5) The governing body of a taxing district conducting such a public
hearing shall:
(a) Schedule the hearing to be held at or after 6:00 p.m. on the same
date as the public hearing on the taxing district's proposed annual bud-
get pursuant to section 63-802A, Idaho Code. If a taxing district holds
a public hearing for the purpose of addressing general business of the
taxing district on the same date as a property tax revenue increase pub-
lic hearing, the public hearing addressing general business items shall
conclude before the beginning of the property tax revenue increase pub-
lic hearing. A taxing district may not schedule a property tax revenue
increase public hearing at the same time as the public hearing of an-
other overlapping taxing district in the same county. The county audi-
tor shall resolve any conflict in public hearing dates and times after
consultation with each affected taxing district;
(b) State the dollar amount of additional property tax revenue that
would be generated each year by the proposed increase;
(c) Explain the reasons for the proposed tax increase, including the
taxing district's intended use of additional property tax revenue; and
(d) Provide an interested party desiring to be heard an opportunity to
present oral testimony within reasonable time limits and without unrea-
sonable restriction on the number of individuals allowed to make public
comment.
(6) A taxing district that intends to increase the property tax portion
of its budget from the previous year shall, at the same time as such taxing
district mails its meeting notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this sec-
tion, mail to each owner of taxable property within its jurisdiction a no-
tice, on a form prescribed by the state tax commission, that contains:
(a) In bold upper-case type no smaller than 18-point font the statement
"NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE";
(b) The value of the property for the previous tax year, the amount of
tax levied on the property for the previous tax year, and the estimated


taxes due on the property for the upcoming tax year if the taxing dis-
trict's proposed budget is adopted. The property tax estimate shall be
based on the most recent year's data that is available to the taxing dis-
trict;
(c) The following statement: "[Insert name of taxing entity] is
proposing a property tax revenue increase for [insert applicable tax
year]. This notice contains estimates of the tax on your property and
the proposed property tax increase on your property as a result of this
property tax revenue increase. These estimates are calculated on the
basis of [insert previous applicable tax year] data. The actual tax on
your property and proposed tax increase on your property may vary from
this estimate.";
(d) The dollar amount of additional property tax revenue that would be
generated each year by the proposed increase in the taxing district's
property tax portion of its budget;
(e) A brief statement of the primary purpose for the proposed increase
in the property tax portion of the budget, including the taxing dis-
trict's intended use of additional property tax revenue described in
paragraph (d) of this subsection;
(f) The date, time, and place of the public hearing pursuant to subsec-
tion (5) of this section;
(g) The internet address for the taxing entity's public website; and
(h) Other information approved by the state tax commission.
(7) A county auditor may conduct an audit to verify a taxing district's
compliance with this section. If the county auditor, after completing an
audit, finds that a taxing district has failed to meet the requirements of
this section, the county auditor shall prepare and submit a report of the au-
ditor's findings to the board of county commissioners. The board of county
commissioners may not certify a tax rate that results in increased property
tax revenues to a taxing district if it determines that the taxing district
has failed to meet the requirements of this section.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.